Washington statutes.
RCW 43.133.080

Effect of chapter on validity of legislative action.

Nothing in this chapter prevents either house of the legislature from acting on any bill or resolution before it as otherwise provided by the state Constitution, by law, and by the rules and joint rules of the senate and house of representatives, nor shall the lack of any sunrise note as provided in this chapter or any error in the accuracy thereof affect the validity of any measure otherwise duly passed by the legislature.

[ 1987 c 342 s 8.]